Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 3, chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 1,  chapter 8,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from  the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Business Development  De-
partment, for the following purposes:
(1) [Operations ..........................................$ 8,218,278]
Operations................................. $ 8,523,087
(2) Business, innovation
[and trade ............................................$ 50,014,240]
and trade................................... $ 50,409,007
(3) [Infrastructure .................................... $ 3,751,472]
Infrastructure ........................... $ 3,818,717
(4) Infrastructure - Tide
Gates and Culverts Program .......... $ 3,000,000
(5) Oregon Film and Video Office ....... $ 1,147,182
(6) Arts and Cultural Trust .................. $ 1,806,250
SECTION 2.
 Section 6, chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund, to the office of the Governor, the amount  of [ $3,932,736]
$4,106,514 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 3.  Section 10,  chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 5, chapter 8,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  Notwithstanding and in lieu of the  requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for a percentage-
based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, the amount allocated from  the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Problem Gambling Treatment Fund is
[$14,578,599] $14,673,344.
SECTION 4.  Section 13,  chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 7, chapter 8,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 1
Sec. 13.  There are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Veterans’  Ser-
vices Fund, to the Veterans’ Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lottery Fund, the following
amounts for the following purposes:
(1) [Veterans’ Services Program ........... $ 10,525,837]
Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 10,797,300
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ................................................$ 6,808,184
(3) National Service
Organizations ..................................... $ 453,486
(4) Veterans’ Affordable Housing ........ $ 1,000,000
SECTION 5.
 Section 13a, chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 13a.  There is allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Veterans’ Ser-
vices Fund, to the Bureau of Labor and Industries, the  amount of [ $250,000] $260,230 for the purpose
of implementing the  provisions of section 1, chapter 528, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
2202).
SECTION 6.  Section 16, chapter 670, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section  8, chapter 8,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  There are allocated to the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the Criminal Fine  Account, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
[and standards operations ................ $ 29,817,371]
and standards operations.......... $ 32,985,769
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ........ $ 279,495
SECTION 7.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 2